Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 10 FOUNDATION PROGRAM — STATE AID — APPORTIONMENT
33-1019. Allocation for school building maintenance required.

School districts shall annually allocate moneys for school building maintenance from any source available to the district equal to at least two percent (2%) of the replacement value of school buildings, less the receipt of state funds as provided in this section. Any school district expending more than four percent (4%) of the replacement value of school buildings for school building maintenance in any single fiscal year, beginning with the expenditures of fiscal year 2005, may apply the excess as a credit against the two percent (2%) requirement of this section until such credit is depleted or fifteen (15) years have expired. The state shall annually provide funds to be allocated for school building maintenance as follows:

Divide one (1) by the school district’s value index for the fiscal year, as calculated pursuant to section 33-906B, Idaho Code; and

Multiply the result by one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the replacement value of school buildings.

For purposes of the calculation in this subsection (1), public charter schools shall be assigned a value index of one (1).

State funds shall be appropriated through the educational support program/division of facilities and disbursed from the school district building account. The order of funding sources used to meet the state funding requirements of this section shall be as follows:

State lottery funds distributed pursuant to section 33-905(2), Idaho Code;

If state lottery funds are insufficient to meet the state funding requirements of this section, then other state funds available pursuant to section 33-905(3), Idaho Code, shall be utilized; and

If the funds in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (2) are insufficient to meet the state funding requirements of this section, then funds available pursuant to section 33-1018B, Idaho Code, shall be utilized.

Moneys allocated for school building maintenance shall be used exclusively for the maintenance and repair of school buildings or any serious or imminent safety hazard on the property of said school buildings as identified pursuant to chapter 80, title 39, Idaho Code, and shall be utilized, first, to abate serious or imminent safety hazards, as identified pursuant to chapter 80, title 39, Idaho Code. Unexpended moneys in a school district’s school building maintenance allocation shall be carried over from year to year and shall remain allocated for the purposes specified in this subsection (3). The replacement value of school buildings shall be determined by multiplying the number of square feet of building floor space in school buildings by eighty-one dollars and forty-five cents ($81.45). Notwithstanding the definition in subsection (8) of this section, school buildings that are less than one (1) year old on the first day of school shall not be used in the replacement value calculation. The joint finance-appropriations committee shall annually review the replacement value per square foot when setting appropriations for the educational support program and may make adjustments to this figure as necessary.

For school buildings first occupied between July 1, 2009, through September 30, 2019, regarding the replacement value calculation that school districts are directed to use to determine the amount of moneys such districts shall allocate for school building maintenance as directed by subsection (1) of this section, a portion of the square footage of school buildings first occupied on or after July 1, 2009, and constructed pursuant to the provisions of section 33-356, Idaho Code, shall not be used in the replacement value calculation, based on the following schedule:

For school buildings at least one (1) year old but less than two (2) years old on the first day of school, exclude one hundred percent (100%) of the square footage;

For school buildings at least two (2) years old but less than three (3) years old on the first day of school, exclude eighty percent (80%) of the square footage;

For school buildings at least three (3) years old but less than four (4) years old on the first day of school, exclude sixty percent (60%) of the square footage;

For school buildings at least four (4) years old but less than five (5) years old on the first day of school, exclude forty percent (40%) of the square footage; and

For school buildings at least five (5) years old but less than six (6) years old on the first day of school, exclude twenty percent (20%) of the square footage.

The amount of relief provided to any school district pursuant to subsection (4) of this section shall not exceed the amount that would be provided if the school district had a value index of one (1).

School districts shall submit the following to the state department of education by not later than the third Friday in December:

The number of square feet of school building floor space; and

The funds and fund sources allocated for school building maintenance and any unexpended allocations carried forward from prior fiscal years; and

The projects on which moneys from the school district’s school building maintenance allocation were expended, and the amount and categories of expenditures; and

The planned uses of the school district’s school building maintenance allocation.

If a school district that is participating in the relief provided for in subsection (4) of this section is forgiven the requirement to allocate the school district portion of the moneys for the two percent (2%) of building replacement value for building maintenance provided in subsection (1) of this section, then once the requirements of subsection (1) of this section are reinstated, the provisions of subsection (4) of this section shall recommence from the time the forgiveness took effect.

For the purposes of this section:

“Annually” means each fiscal year.

“School building” means buildings that are owned by the school district or leased by the school district through a lease-purchase agreement and are regularly occupied by students.

“School district” means a school district or public charter school.

The state department of education shall transmit a summary of such reports to the legislature by not later than January 15 of the following year.

33-1020. Idaho digital learning academy funding.

Of the moneys appropriated for the educational support program, an amount shall be distributed to support the Idaho digital learning academy, created pursuant to chapter 55, title 33, Idaho Code. For the purposes of this section, an “enrollment” shall be counted each time an Idaho school age child enrolls in an Idaho digital learning academy class. A single child enrolled in multiple classes shall count as multiple enrollments. Summer enrollments shall be included in the fiscal year that begins that summer. The amount distributed shall be calculated as follows:

A base amount shall be distributed, equal to the current fiscal year’s statewide average salary-based apportionment funding per midterm support unit, multiplied by twenty-six (26).

A variable amount shall be distributed, equal to the number of enrollments multiplied by the current fiscal year’s appropriation of state funds for the educational support program per student reported in attendance for the first reporting period, divided by twenty-three (23).

The state department of education shall make an estimated distribution of funds to the Idaho digital learning academy by no later than July 31 of each fiscal year, consisting of eighty percent (80%) of the estimated funding for the fiscal year. The balance of all remaining funds to be distributed, pursuant to the calculations in this section, shall be distributed by no later than May 15 of the same fiscal year.

33-1021. Math and science requirement.

In order to meet state graduation requirements regarding math and science courses, moneys shall be distributed to school districts to defray the cost of providing additional math and science courses. Moneys so distributed shall be used to hire additional high school math and science teachers or to defray costs associated with providing math and science courses to high school students. Moneys shall be distributed to school districts from the moneys appropriated to the educational support program for each regular high school, not including alternative schools, based on the following criteria:

For each school with enrollment of 99 or less, distribute the equivalent of one and one-quarter (1.25) of a classified staff position.

For each school with enrollment of 100 to 159, distribute the equivalent of one ninth (1/9) of a classified staff position.

For each school with enrollment of 160 to 319, distribute the equivalent of two sevenths (2/7) of a classified staff position.

For each school with enrollment of 320 to 639, distribute the equivalent of one (1.0) instructional staff position, based on the statewide average funding per position.

For each school with enrollment of 640 or more, distribute the equivalent of one (1.0) instructional staff position, based on the statewide average funding per position, and three-quarters (0.75) of a classified staff position. For the purposes of these school size classifications for regular high schools that serve only grades 10-12, ninth grade students who will attend the regular high school upon matriculating to tenth grade shall be included as enrolled in the regular high school.

33-1022. Public school technology. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to S.L. 2013, ch. 340, § 8, effective July 1, 2013.

33-1023. Moneys provided from unanticipated public charter school closure.

In the event a public charter school closes and ceases to provide educational instruction during the course of a school year, the following provisions relating to funding shall apply:

A school district or public charter school shall report to the state department of education all newly enrolled students when such students have enrolled from a public charter school that has closed during a school year.

The state department of education shall use the reported enrollment information provided for in subsection (1) of this section to calculate the funding that the district or public charter school would have received had those reported new enrollees been enrolled in such district for the entire school year. Such funding shall be prorated based on the percent of days left in the school year following the enrollment of new students. Such funding shall be included in the next scheduled payment to the school district or public charter school.

33-1024. Online portals.

Of the moneys appropriated to the educational support program, up to one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) may be expended for the development and maintenance of an internet-based portal of available online, nonsectarian K-12 or dual credit courses; an adult education portal; and a parent resource portal.

The nonsectarian K-12 or dual credit courses portal shall include any of the following:

Idaho digital learning academy;

Idaho public school districts;

Idaho public charter schools;

Idaho public colleges and universities;

Idaho private colleges and universities accredited by the same organization that accredits Idaho’s public colleges and universities; and

Any provider of online courses; provided however, that the courses available on the portal have been verified and approved by the state department of education to meet state content standards.

At a minimum, the nonsectarian K-12 or dual credit courses portal shall:

Include and display customer ratings from students and parents, based upon previous student enrollment with the online course, provider and instructor. Such ratings shall, at a minimum, evaluate the quality of content, instruction, communications and ease of use;

Include the capacity for parents to notify their student’s home school of their desire to enroll their student in an online course listed on the portal; and

Facilitate communications between listed online course providers, students and parents and the home school in which the student is enrolled.

At a minimum, the adult education or parent resource portal shall provide access to tools and resources focused on K-12 education.

33-1025. Wireless technology standards.

School districts and public charter schools shall demonstrate to the state department of education that wireless infrastructure meets or exceeds the wireless technology standards recommended by the education opportunity resource committee and approved by the state department of education. The education opportunity resource committee shall annually review and recommend wireless technology standards to the state department of education.

Content filtering and wireless security. Internet content filtering shall be included as part of any wireless internet access made available to children, as required by section 33-132, Idaho Code. The filtering solution shall be configurable to school district policies on acceptable, age appropriate internet content. The content filtering shall include the ability:

For each school to manage its own filtering policies, including the decision to block specific categories of content and to maintain its own whitelist and blacklist overrides;

To provide individual district utilization and filtering reports, including the most frequently visited websites, the most frequently visited categories, the most frequently blocked websites, search terms most frequently used and the top authenticated users;

To audit all changes to content filtering;

For all reporting and management of content filtering to be available through any internet-connected browser and efficiently perform all content filtering functions; and

To protect against eavesdropping and unauthorized access, which shall include encryption or other techniques to provide assurances that the school district may turn on or off as school district policy indicates.

33-1026. Mandatory public school funding formula review.

The senate and house of representatives education committees shall conduct a comprehensive review of the public school funding formula at least once every five (5) years, with the first such review to occur by July 1, 2024.

33-1027. Student enrollment counts and rulemaking.

The state board of education shall promulgate rules that set forth the procedures for determining student enrollment counts by school, school district, and statewide, and the process for reporting such counts. Such rules shall be consistent with the following:

Full-time enrollment (FTE) shall be based on enrollment in any school district or public charter school;

A student shall not exceed a total of one (1.0) unweighted FTE in a single school year, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section;

A kindergarten student shall not exceed a total of one-half (0.5) unweighted enrollment in a single school year;

A student attending a summer school or night school program shall not exceed a total of one-fourth (0.25) unweighted enrollment. Such student may be counted pursuant to both this subsection and subsection (2) of this section;

A fractional enrollment count schedule shall be specified for any student enrolled less than one (1.0) FTE in a given school district or public charter school;

FTE is based on the courses a student is enrolled in at the time of the official count, as specified in board rule, except that a student may be counted as enrolled if the term for which such student is enrolled begins after the time of the official count;

Each school district or public charter school shall conduct an official count of enrolled students in the district or school on the first day of October, the first day of December, the first day of February, and the first day of April, or the previous school day if those dates do not fall on a school day; and

A school district or public charter school may not count as enrolled any student who has unexcused absences totaling eleven (11) or more consecutive school days immediately prior to and including the official count date.

33-1028. Reports to state board — Report to legislature. [Null and void, effective July 1, 2022.]

By December 15 each year, each school district and public charter school shall report to the state board of education or to the board’s designee the following information:

Total student enrollment as of October 1 and December 1 in the year the report is made, or the previous school day if those dates do not fall on a school day;

The number of at-risk students in the school district or at the public charter school as of October 1 and December 1 in the year the report is made, or the previous school day if those dates do not fall on a school day, and the number of at-risk students:

By grade; and

Enrolled in an alternative school;

The number of economically disadvantaged students in the school district or at the public charter school as of October 1 and December 1 in the year the report is made, or the previous school day if those dates do not fall on a school day, and the number of students who qualify as economically disadvantaged by grade;

The number of English language learners in the school district or at the public charter school as of October 1 and December 1 in the year the report is made, or the previous school day if those dates do not fall on a school day, and the number of English language learners per grade;

The number of gifted and talented students in the school district or at the public charter school as of October 1 and December 1 in the year the report is made, or the previous school day if those dates do not fall on a school day, and the number of gifted and talented students per grade; and

The local salary schedule for the school district or public charter school in effect for the school year prior to the year the report is made.

Beginning in 2020, a school district or public charter school shall include, in the report made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the following information for the fiscal year prior to the fiscal year in which the report is made:

The amounts received by the school district or public charter school for each statutory program line item distribution, other program line item distribution, and discretionary funds distribution specified in the state appropriation for public school support; and

The actual expenditures by the school district or public charter school for each such line item distribution and discretionary funds distribution, unless information on the actual expenditures by district or school for a distribution is submitted to the state pursuant to another law or rule.

By January 15 each year, the state board of education shall report to the senate and house of representatives education committees and the joint finance-appropriations committee on the information received pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The state board’s report shall include such information for each individual school district and public charter school and shall also summarize the information in aggregate statewide. The state board’s report shall further include allocations made for each cell of the career ladder pursuant to section 33-1004B, Idaho Code.